Massachusetts, session 194th, H5094.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 1 of chapter 50 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the definition of “Aldermen” the following
definition:-
“Artificial intelligence” or “AI”, the capability of a computer system to perform tasks that
normally require human intelligence, including, but not limited to, visual perception, speech
recognition, content generation and decision-making.
SECTION 2. Said section 1 of said chapter 50, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by inserting after the definition of “Federal act” the following definition:-
“Generative artificial intelligence”, artificial intelligence technology capable of creating
content, including, but not limited to, text, audio, image or video based on patterns learned from
large volumes of data rather than being explicitly programmed with rules.
of 2

SECTION 3. Said section 1 of said chapter 50, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by inserting after the definition of “State officer” the following definition:-
“Synthetic media”, audio or video content substantially produced by generative artificial
intelligence.
SECTION 4. Chapter 56 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the following
section:-
Section 70. (a) Any audio or video communication that: (i) is paid for by a candidate
campaign committee, political action committee, political issues committee, political party or a
person using a contribution; (ii) is intended to influence voting for or against a candidate or
ballot proposition in an election or primary; and (iii) contains synthetic media shall include: (1)
at the beginning and end of the communication the words “contains content generated by AI”;
and (2) throughout the duration of each portion of the communication containing synthetic media
the words: (A) “This video content was generated by AI”, if the communication includes only
video synthetic media; provided, that the words shall be in legible writing; (B) “This audio
content was generated by AI”, if the communication includes only audio synthetic media;
provided, that the words shall be in a clearly spoken manner; or (C) “This content was generated
by AI”, if the communication includes both video and audio synthetic media; provided, that the
words shall be in legible writing.
(b) A violation of this section shall be punished by a fine of not more than $1,000.
Compliance with this section shall not exempt a person from civil or criminal liability for a
violation of other applicable law.
of 2